North Dakota statutes. TITLE 40 Municipal Government
CHAPTER 40-59 Municipal Memorial Levy

40-59-01.
Armory or memorial funding.

The governing body of any municipality maintaining an armory annually may
provide funding from revenues derived from its general fund levy authority for armory or memorial hall maintenance, repair, alteration, and reconstruction.

Source:

S.L. 1957, ch. 286, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 40-5901; S.L. 1983, ch. 593, § 31; 1983, ch. 606, § 51; 2015, ch. 439, § 60, eff for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2014.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 60 of chapter 439, S.L. 2015 is effective for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2014.

Cross-References.

Recreation centers and facilities as memorials, see § 40-55-11.

40-59-02.
Resolution and notice of election.

The resolution and order of the governing body of the municipality calling an election pursuant to the provisions of this chapter shall contain a general description of the precise purpose for which a tax is to be levied and collected, the maximum mills per annum to be levied not to exceed two mills per annum, and the time when such election shall be held. Notice of the adoption of such resolution and of the election to be held in pursuance thereof shall be published by the auditor thirty days prior to the day of election.

Source:

S.L. 1957, ch. 286, § 2; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 40-5902; S.L. 1967, ch. 323, § 227.

40-59-03.
Form of ballot.

The form of the ballot at an election authorized by this chapter shall be prepared by the auditor and shall be substantially as follows:

Shall a levy of not to exceed two mills be made for the purpose of ? Yes

⎭

No

⎭

Click to view

There shall be inserted in the blank space in such question appropriate words describing the purpose and nature of the improvement to be undertaken.

Source:

S.L. 1957, ch. 286, § 3; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 40-5903; S.L. 1967, ch. 323, § 228.

40-59-04.
Conduct of election.

A special election upon the question of levying taxes for such purpose shall be held at a time to be set by the governing body of the municipality. The votes cast upon the question of the proposed tax levy shall be returned and canvassed as other votes cast at elections are returned and canvassed, and the result of such election shall be certified and spread upon the minutes of the proceedings of the governing body of the municipality at the next regular or special meeting thereafter.

Source:

S.L. 1957, ch. 286, § 4; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 40-5904.